Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3510
Federal government; other states; agreements; control of sources of radiation; department; powers.

(1) The department may enter into an agreement or agreements with the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission pursuant to the federal Atomic Energy Act of 1954, section 274i, as amended, other federal governmental agencies as authorized by law, other states, or interstate agencies whereby this state will perform on a cooperative basis with the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission, other federal governmental agencies, other states, or interstate agencies inspections or other functions relating to control of sources of radiation.

(2) The department may institute training programs for the purpose of qualifying personnel to carry out the Radiation Control Act and may make such personnel available for participation in any program or programs of the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies in furtherance of the purposes of such act.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 10, p. 1304;

Laws 1975, LB 157, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 14.